Massachusetts, session 194th, S2281.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The title of section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the words “funding for energy
efficiency,” the following words:- and decarbonization.
SECTION 2. The title of section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “gas energy efficiency
programs” .
SECTION 3. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 3 after the words “to fund energy efficiency,” the
following words:- and decarbonization.
SECTION 4. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 23 after the words “for energy efficiency,” the
following word:- , decarbonization.
of 6

SECTION 5. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 27 after the words “all available efficiency” the
following words:- and decarbonization.
SECTION 6. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 32 after the word “cooling” the following words:-
as set forth in section b(2) of section 21 of this chapter.
SECTION 7. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended in lines 35, 36 and 37 by striking out the words “The Department
may approve and fund gas energy efficiency programs proposed by gas distribution companies
including, but limited to, demand side management programs” .
SECTION 8. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting a new sentence in line 39 after the sentence ending with
the words “heating and cooling projects” the following words:- Such projects shall be
administered by the electric distribution companies and by municipal aggregators with energy
plans certified by the department under subsection (b) of section 134 of chapter 164.
SECTION 9. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended in lines 41 and 42 by striking out the words, “The programs shall be
administered by the gas distribution companies” .
SECTION 10. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 44 after the word “efficiency” the
following words:- and decarbonization.
of 6

SECTION 11. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 49 after the word “cooling” the following
words:- as set forth in section b(2) of section 21 of this chapter.
SECTION 12. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 51 by striking out the words “and gas” .
SECTION 13. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 44 after the words “energy efficiency”
the following words:- and decarbonization.
SECTION 14. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 61 by striking out the words “and gas” .
SECTION 15. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 71 after the word “cooling” the following
words:- as set forth in section b(2) of section 21 of this chapter.
SECTION 16. Section 19 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 73 by striking out the words “and gas” .
SECTION 17. The title of section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the words “and natural gas” .
SECTION 18. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 3 by striking out the words “and natural gas” .
SECTION 19. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in lines 13, 14 and 15 by striking out the words “and the
of 6

natural gas distribution companies shall jointly prepare a natural gas efficiency investment plan.
Each” and inserting in its place the word:- The.
SECTION 20. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 18 after the words “energy efficiency”
the following words:- and decarbonization.
SECTION 21. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 22 after the word “cooling” the following
words:- as set forth in section b(2) of section 21 of this chapter.
SECTION 22. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 31 after the word “cooling” the following
words:- as set forth in section b(2) of section 21 of this chapter.
SECTION 23. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 39 after the word “cooling” the following
words:- as set forth in this section.
SECTION 24. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 124 after the word “cooling” the
following words:- as set forth in section b(2) of section 21 of this chapter.
SECTION 25. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in lines 135, 140, 142, 145, 153, and 169 by striking out the
words “and natural gas” .
of 6

SECTION 26. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 161 after the word “cooling” the
following words:- as set forth in section b(2) of section 21 of this chapter.
SECTION 27. Section 21 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended in line 183 by striking out the words “or natural gas” .
SECTION 28. The title of section 22 of chapter 25 of General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended after the words “energy efficiency” by inserting the
following words:- and decarbonization.
SECTION 29. The first sentence of section 22(a) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most
recently amended by section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the
words “convene an energy efficiency” by inserting the following words:- and decarbonization.
SECTION 30. The last sentence of Section 22(a) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most
recently amended by section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the
words “each of the electric” by striking out the words “and natural gas” .
SECTION 31. Section 22(b) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the words “through energy
efficiency” by inserting the following word:- , decarbonization.
SECTION 32. Section 22(b) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the words “statewide energy
efficiency” by inserting the following words:- and decarbonization.
of 6

SECTION 33. Section 22(b) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the words “and
recommended long term efficiency,” by inserting the following word:- , decarbonization.
SECTION 34. Section 22(b) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most recently amended by
section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the words “approval of
100 efficiency,” by inserting the following word:- , decarbonization.
101 SECTION 35. Section 22(c) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most recently amended by
102 section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the words “these purposes
103 from the” by striking out words “natural gas and” .
104 SECTION 36. Section 22(d) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most recently amended by
105 section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended by striking out both instances of
106 the words “and natural gas” .
107 SECTION 37. Section 22(b) of chapter 25 of General Laws, as most recently amended by
108 section 140 of chapter 7 of the acts of 2023, is hereby amended after the words “the total energy
109 efficiency,” by inserting the following words:- and decarbonization.
of 6